North Dakota statutes. TITLE 40 Municipal Government
CHAPTER 40-58 Urban Renewal Law
40-58-13.
Cooperation by public bodies.

For the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of a development or renewal project located within the area in which it is authorized to act, any public body may, upon any terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine:

Dedicate, sell, convey, or lease any of its interest in any property or grant easements, licenses, or other rights or privileges therein to a municipality;

Incur the entire expense of any public improvements made by the public body in exercising the powers granted in this section;

Do any and all things necessary to aid or cooperate in the planning or carrying out of a development or renewal plan;

Lend, grant, or contribute funds to a municipality;

Enter into agreements which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any law to the contrary with a municipality or other public body relating to action to be taken pursuant to any of the powers granted by this chapter, including the furnishing of funds or other assistance in connection with a development or renewal project; and

Cause public buildings and public facilities, including parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake to be furnished; furnish, dedicate, close, vacate, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan, or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways, or other places; plan or replan or zone or rezone any part of the public body or make exceptions from building regulations; and cause administrative and other services to be furnished to the municipality. If at any time title to or possession of any development or renewal project is held by any public body or governmental agency, other than the municipality, which is authorized by law to engage in the undertaking, carrying out, or administration of development or renewal projects, including the federal government, the provisions of the agreements referred to in this section inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by the public body or governmental agency. As used in this subsection, the term “municipality” shall also include an urban renewal agency or a housing authority vested with authority pursuant to section 40-58-15.

Any sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement provided for in this section may be made by a public body without appraisal, public notice, advertisement, or public bidding.

For the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of the authority of an urban renewal agency or a housing authority, a municipality may in addition to its other powers and upon any terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine do and perform any or all of the actions or things which, by the provisions of subsection 1, a public body is authorized to do or perform, including the furnishing of financial and other assistance.

For the purposes of this section, or for the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of a development or renewal project of a municipality, the municipality may in addition to any authority to issue bonds pursuant to section 40-58-10 issue and sell its general obligation bonds. Any bonds issued by a municipality pursuant to this section must be issued in the manner and within the limitations prescribed by the laws of this state for the issuance and authorization of bonds by the municipality for public purposes generally.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 13; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5813; S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 13.

40-58-14.
Title of purchaser.

Any instrument executed by a municipality and purporting to convey any right, title, or interest in any property under this chapter shall be conclusively presumed to have been executed in compliance with the provisions of this chapter insofar as title or other interest of any bona fide purchasers, lessees, or transferees of such property is concerned.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 14; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5814.

40-58-15.
Exercise of urban renewal project powers.

A municipality may itself exercise its urban renewal project powers, as defined by this section, or may, if the governing body by resolution determines the action to be in the public interest, elect to have those powers exercised by the urban renewal agency created by section 40-58-16 or by the housing authority, if one exists or is subsequently established in the community. In the event the governing body makes that determination, the urban renewal agency or the housing authority, as the case may be, is vested with all of the urban renewal project powers in the same manner as though those powers were conferred on the agency or authority instead of the municipality. However, an urban renewal agency or housing authority may not exercise any rights, powers, functions, and duties of a municipality under this chapter which relate to the development of industrial or commercial property under section 40-58-20.1. If the governing body does not elect to make a determination under this subsection, the municipality may exercise its urban renewal project powers through a board or commissioner or through any officers of the municipality as the governing body may by resolution determine.

As used in this section, the term “urban renewal project powers” includes the rights, powers, functions, and duties of a municipality under this chapter, except the following:

The power to determine an area to be industrial or commercial property or a slum or blighted area or combination thereof and to designate the property or area as appropriate for a development or renewal project;

The power to approve and amend development or renewal plans and to hold any public hearings required with respect to those plans;

The power to establish a general plan for the locality as a whole;

The power to formulate a workable program under section 40-58-04;

The powers, duties, and functions referred to in section 40-58-18;

The power to make the determinations and findings provided for in sections 40-58-03 and 40-58-05 and subsection 4 of section 40-58-06 40-58-06;

The power to issue general obligation bonds; and

The power to appropriate funds, to levy taxes within the limitations of the capital improvements fund under section 57-15-38 and to levy assessments, and to exercise other powers provided for in subsection 8 of section 40-58-07.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 15; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5815; S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 14; 2015, ch. 439, § 59, eff for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 59 of chapter 439, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2014.

40-58-16.
Urban renewal agency.

There is created in each municipality a public body corporate and politic to be known as the “urban renewal agency” of the municipality; provided, that the agency may not transact any business or exercise its powers under this chapter until or unless the local governing body has made the finding prescribed in section 40-58-05 and has elected to have the urban renewal project powers exercised by an urban renewal agency as provided in section 40-58-15.

If the urban renewal agency is authorized to transact business and exercise powers under this chapter, the mayor, by and with the advice and consent of the local governing body, shall appoint a board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency which must consist of five commissioners. The term of office of each commissioner is one year.

A commissioner may not receive compensation for services but is entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of the commissioner’s duties. Each commissioner shall hold office until a successor has been appointed and has qualified. A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner must be filed with the clerk of the municipality and the certificate is conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of the commissioner.

The powers of an urban renewal agency must be exercised by the commissioners of the agency. A majority of the commissioners constitutes a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising the powers of the agency and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the agency upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present, unless in any case the bylaws require a larger number. Approval of the payment of an account or claim must be recorded in the record of the agency’s proceedings and this is sufficient to indicate approval without requiring a majority of the commissioners to sign or initial the voucher or order for payment.

Any persons may be appointed as commissioners if they reside within the area of operation of the agency which shall be coterminous with the area of operation of the municipality and are otherwise eligible for appointments under this chapter. The mayor shall designate a chairman and vice chairman from among the commissioners. An agency may employ an executive director, technical experts, and such other agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. For legal services it may require, an agency may employ or retain its own counsel and legal staff. An agency authorized to transact business and exercise powers under this chapter shall file, with the local governing body, on or before March thirty-first of each year a report of its activities for the preceding calendar year, which report must include a complete financial statement setting forth its assets, liabilities, income, and operating expense as of the end of the calendar year. At the time of filing the report, the agency shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the community a notice to the effect that the report has been filed with the municipality and that the report is available for inspection during business hours in the office of the auditor and in the office of the agency.

For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a commissioner may be removed only after a hearing and after the commissioner has been given a copy of the charges at least ten days prior to the hearing and has had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 16; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5816; S.L. 1975, ch. 366, § 8; 1989, ch. 499, § 15.

40-58-17.
Interested public officials, commissioners, or employees.

No public official or employee of a municipality or board or commission thereof, and no commissioner or employee of a housing authority or urban renewal agency which has been vested by a municipality with urban renewal project powers under section 40-58-15 shall voluntarily acquire any interest, direct or indirect, in any development or renewal project, or in any property included or planned to be included in any development or renewal project of the municipality or in any contract or proposed contract in connection with the development or renewal project. If the acquisition is not voluntary, the interest acquired must be immediately disclosed in writing to the governing body and the disclosure must be entered upon the minutes of the governing body. If an official, commissioner, or employee presently owns or controls, or owned or controlled within the preceding two years, any interest, direct or indirect, in any property which that official, commissioner, or employee knows is included or planned to be included in a development or renewal project, that official, commissioner, or employee shall immediately disclose this act in writing to the governing body, and the disclosure must be entered upon the minutes of the governing body, and any such official, commissioner, or employee may not participate in any action by the municipality or board or commission thereof, housing authority, or urban renewal agency affecting the property. Any disclosure required to be made by this section to the governing body must be concurrently made to a housing authority or urban renewal agency which has been vested with urban renewal project powers by the municipality pursuant to the provisions of section 40-58-15. A commissioner or other officer of any housing authority, urban renewal agency, board, or commission exercising powers pursuant to this chapter may not hold any other public office under the municipality other than the commissionership or office with respect to the housing authority, urban renewal agency, board, or commission. Any violation of the provisions of this section constitutes misconduct in office.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 17; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5817; S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 16.

40-58-18.
Ordinances relating to repair, closing, and demolition of dwellings unfit for human habitation.

If a municipality finds that there exist in the municipality dwellings which are unfit for human habitation due to dilapidation, defects increasing the hazards of fire, accidents or other calamities, lack of ventilation, light or sanitary facilities, or due to other conditions, including those set forth in subsection 3, rendering those dwellings unsafe or unsanitary, or dangerous or detrimental to the health, safety, or morals, or otherwise inimical to the welfare of the residents of the municipality, the municipality may require or cause the repair, closing, or demolition or removal of those dwellings in the manner provided by this section.

Upon the adoption of an ordinance finding that dwelling conditions of the character described in subsection 1 exist within a municipality, the governing body of the municipality may adopt ordinances relating to the dwellings within the municipality. The ordinances must include the following provisions:

That a public officer be designated or appointed to exercise the powers prescribed by the ordinances.

If a petition is filed with the public officer or by at least five residents of the municipality charging that any dwelling is unfit for human habitation or whenever it appears to the public officer on the public officer’s own motion that any dwelling is unfit for human habitation, the public officer shall, if the public officer’s preliminary investigation discloses a basis for those charges, issue and cause to be served upon the owner, every mortgagee of record and all parties in interest in the dwelling, including persons in possession, a complaint stating the charges in that respect. The complaint must contain a notice that a hearing will be held before the public officer or the public officer’s designated agent at a place designated in the complaint not less than ten days nor more than thirty days after the serving of the complaint; that the owner, mortgagee, and parties in interest must be given the right to file an answer to the complaint and to appear in person, or otherwise, and give testimony at the place and time designated in the complaint; and that the rules of evidence are not controlling in hearings before the public officer.

If, after the notice and hearing, the public officer determines that the dwelling under consideration is unfit for human habitation, the public officer shall state in writing the findings of fact in support of the determination and shall issue and cause to be served upon the owner of the dwelling an order which:

If the repair, alteration, or improvement of the dwelling can be made at a reasonable cost in relation to the value of the dwelling, the ordinance of the municipality shall fix a certain percentage of the cost as being reasonable for that purpose, requires the owner, within the time specified in the order, to repair, alter, or improve the dwelling to render it fit for human habitation or to vacate and close the dwelling as a human habitation; or

If the repair, alteration, or improvement of the dwelling cannot be made at a reasonable cost in relation to the value of the dwelling, the ordinance of the municipality shall fix a certain percentage of the cost as being reasonable for that purpose, requires the owner, within the time specified in the order, to remove or demolish the dwelling.

If the owner fails to comply with an order to repair, alter, or improve or to vacate and close the dwelling, the public officer may cause the dwelling to be repaired, altered, or improved, or to be vacated and closed.

If the owner fails to comply with an order to remove or demolish the dwelling, the public officer may cause the dwelling to be removed or demolished.

The amount of the cost of any repairs, alterations, or improvements, or vacating and closing, or removal or demolition by the public officer constitutes a lien against the real property upon which the cost was incurred and the lien, including an allowance of the public officer’s costs and necessary attorney’s fees, may be foreclosed in judicial proceedings in the manner provided by law for loans secured by liens on real property. If the dwelling is removed or demolished by the public officer, the public officer shall sell the materials of the dwelling and credit the proceeds of the sale against the cost of the removal or demolition. Any balance remaining must be paid to the parties entitled to it as determined by proper judicial proceedings instituted by the public officer after deducting the costs of the judicial proceedings, including necessary attorney’s fees incurred in those proceedings by the public officer, as determined by the court.

An ordinance adopted by a municipality pursuant to this section must provide that the public officer may determine that a dwelling is unfit for human habitation if the public officer finds that conditions exist in the dwelling which are dangerous or injurious to the health, safety, or morals of the occupants of the dwelling, the occupants of neighboring dwellings, or other residents of the municipality, or which have a blighting influence on properties in the area. Those conditions may include defects in the dwelling increasing the hazards of fire, accident, or other calamities; lack of adequate ventilation, light, or sanitary facilities; dilapidation; disrepair; structural defects; uncleanliness; overcrowding; inadequate ingress and egress; inadequate drainage; or any violation of health, fire, building, or zoning regulations, or any other laws or regulations relating to the use of land and the use and occupancy of building and improvements. The ordinance may provide additional standards to guide the public officer or the public officer’s agents or employees in determining the fitness of a dwelling for human habitation.

Complaints or orders issued by a public officer pursuant to an ordinance adopted under this section must be served upon persons either personally or by registered or certified mail, but if the location of those persons is unknown and cannot be ascertained by the public officer in the exercise of reasonable diligence, and the public officer shall make an affidavit to that effect, then the serving of the complaint or order upon those persons may be made by publishing the complaint or order once each week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper printed and published in the municipality, or, in the absence of such newspaper, in one printed and published in the county and circulating in the municipality in which the dwellings are located. A copy of the complaint or order must be posted in a conspicuous place on the premises affected by the complaint or order. A copy of the complaint or order must also be filed with the clerk of the county in which the dwelling is located and the filing of the complaint or order has the same force and effect as other lis pendens notices provided by law.

Any person affected by an order issued by the public officer may petition the district court, in accordance with the procedure provided in section 28-34-01, for an injunction restraining the public officer from carrying out the provisions of the order, and the court may, upon that petition, issue a temporary injunction restraining the public officer pending the final disposition of the cause. Hearings must be held by the court on the petitions within twenty days, or as soon thereafter as possible, and must be given preference over other matters on the court’s calendar. The court shall hear and determine the issues raised and enter a final order or decree in the proceeding. In the proceeding, the findings of the public officer as to facts, if supported by evidence, are conclusive. The court may assess costs. The remedies provided under this section are exclusive remedies and a person affected by an order of the public officer may not recover any damages for action taken pursuant to any order of the public officer, or because of compliance by that person with any order of the public officer.

An ordinance adopted by the governing body of the municipality may authorize the public officer to exercise those powers as may be necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this chapter, including the following powers in addition to other authority granted under this section:

To investigate the dwelling conditions in the municipality in order to determine which dwellings are unfit for human habitation;

To administer oaths and affirmations, examine witnesses, and receive evidence;

To enter any premises for the purpose of making examinations, provided that entry must be made in a manner that causes the least possible inconvenience to the persons in possession, and to obtain an order for this purpose from a court of competent jurisdiction in the event entry is denied or resisted;

To appoint and fix the duties of such officers, agents, and employees as the public officer deems necessary to carry out the purposes of the ordinance; and

To delegate any of the public officer’s functions and powers under the ordinance to such officers, agents, and employees as the public officer may designate.

The governing body of any municipality adopting an ordinance under this section shall as soon as possible prepare an estimate of the annual expenses or costs to provide the equipment, personnel, and supplies necessary for periodic examinations and investigations of the dwellings in the municipality for the purpose of determining the fitness of the dwellings for human habitation, and for the enforcement and administration of its ordinance or ordinances adopted under this section.

This section may not be construed to abrogate or impair the powers of the courts or of any department of any municipality to enforce any provisions of its charter or its ordinances or regulations, nor to prevent or punish violations thereof; and the powers conferred by this section are in addition and supplemental to the powers conferred by any other law.

This section may not be construed to impair or limit in any way the power of the municipality to define and declare nuisances and to cause their removal or abatement, by summary proceedings or otherwise.

The governing body of a city may adopt ordinances prescribing minimum standards for the use and occupancy of dwellings throughout the city and to prevent the use or occupancy of any dwelling which is injurious to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 281, § 18; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 40-5818; S.L. 1983, ch. 82, § 85; 1989, ch. 83, § 17; 1989, ch. 499, § 17.

40-58-19.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 19.

40-58-20.
Tax increment financing.

At any time after the governing body of a municipality has approved a development or renewal plan for any development or renewal area and has filed that plan with the department of commerce division of community services, it may request the county auditor and treasurer to compute, certify, and remit tax increments resulting from the development or renewal of the area in accordance with the plan and any modifications thereof, and the county auditor and treasurer shall do so in accordance with this section.

For a tax increment district established before July 1, 2011, the base year for tax increments computed for a development or renewal area under this section or section 40-58-20.1 may not be used for more than twenty-five taxable years without the governing body of the municipality establishing a new base year using taxable values, established as of February first of the following year, which are not more than fifteen years old. Regardless of length of the initial district, the new base year may be used to compute tax increments for up to an additional fifteen years after which time the tax increment district must be closed, except that the original base year for tax increments pledged for an indebtedness incurred before July 1, 2011, may continue until the indebtedness is paid.

For a tax increment district established after July 1, 2011, the base year for tax increments computed for a development or renewal area under this section or section 40-58-20.1 may not be used for more than twenty-five taxable years without the governing body of the municipality establishing a new base year using taxable values, established as of February first of the following year, which are not more than fifteen years old. The new base year may be used to compute tax increments for up to an additional five years after which time the tax increment district must be closed.

The auditor shall compute and certify the original taxable value of each lot and parcel of real estate in the area, as last assessed and equalized before the date of the request, including the taxable value of any lot or parcel previously acquired by the municipality or its urban renewal agency, as last assessed and equalized before it was acquired. However, any real property acquired by the city or the city’s urban renewal agency prior to July 1, 1973, or more than five years prior to the approval of a development or renewal plan for any development or renewal area, whichever is later, is deemed to have an original taxable value of zero and the county auditor shall so certify.

In each subsequent year, the auditor shall compute and certify the net amount by which the original taxable value of all lots and parcels of real estate in the area, as then assessed and equalized, including real estate then held by the municipality or urban renewal agency valued at zero, has increased or decreased in comparison with the original taxable value of all such real estate. The net amount of the increase or decrease is referred to in this section as the incremental value or the lost value for that year, as the case may be.

In any year when there is an incremental value, the auditor shall exclude it from the taxable value upon which the auditor computes the mill rates of taxes levied in that year by the state, the county, the municipality, the school district, and every other political subdivision having power to tax the development or renewal area, until the cost of development or renewal of the area has been reimbursed in accordance with this section. However, the auditor shall extend the aggregate mill rate of those taxes against the incremental value as well as the original taxable value, and the amount of taxes received from that extension against the incremental value is referred to in this section as the tax increment for that year.

In any year when there is a lost value, the auditor shall compute and certify the amounts of taxes which would have resulted from the extension against the lost value of the mill rate of taxes levied that year by the state and each political subdivision having power to tax the development or renewal area. The amounts so computed are referred to in this section as the tax losses for that year.

The county auditor shall segregate all tax increments from the development or renewal area in a special fund, crediting to the fund, in each year when there is an incremental value, that proportion of each collection of taxes on real estate within the area which the incremental value bears to the total taxable value in that year.

Upon receipt of any tax increments in the fund, the county treasurer, at the times when the county treasurer distributes collected taxes to the state and to each political subdivision for which a tax loss has previously been recorded, shall also remit to each of them from the tax increment fund an amount proportionate to the amount of that tax loss, until all those tax losses have been reimbursed. Thereafter, at the time of each distribution, the county treasurer shall remit the entire balance then on hand in the fund to the municipality, until the cost of development or renewal of the area has been reimbursed to the municipality as provided in this section.

The cost of development or renewal subject to reimbursement from the tax increment fund for each development or renewal area must include all expenditures incident to carrying out the development or renewal plan for the area and any modifications thereof, not otherwise reimbursed in one of the ways referred to below, including all expenses of the clearance, development, redevelopment, rehabilitation, and conservation of the area, and all interest and redemption premiums paid on bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the municipality or urban renewal agency to provide funds for payment of those expenses, subject to section 40-58-20.1 for the purpose of determining eligible cost of development of industrial or commercial property. From the total cost to be reimbursed there must be deducted, except as provided below, all amounts received from the federal government or others, and all special assessments, revenues, and other receipts except property taxes, which are actually collected and applied to the payment of the cost or the bonds, notes, or other obligations, at the times when those payments are due. However, if the proceeds of tax increments or of bonds, notes, or other obligations are loaned to finance part or all of the cost of a project comprising the restoration, reconstruction, and improvement of a privately owned state historical site situated within the development or renewal area or any buildings or structures thereon, as contemplated in section 55-10-08, or of a property listed in the national register of historic places, as contemplated in section 55-10-11, in consideration of the grant to the city of a historic easement with respect thereto, repayments of the loan may not be deducted from the cost of development or renewal subject to reimbursement.

The tax increments from any development or renewal area may be appropriated by the governing body of the municipality for the payment of any general obligation bonds, special improvement warrants, or refunding improvement bonds issued by the municipality to provide funds for payment of the cost of development or renewal, together with interest and redemption premiums thereon, other than that portion, if any, of such principal, interest, and redemption premiums which can be paid when due from collections of special assessments, revenues, or other funds, excluding property taxes, which are pledged for the payment thereof. When special improvement warrants or refunding improvement bonds are issued to pay the cost of public improvements of special benefit to properties within the development or renewal area, the governing body may cause those special benefits to be computed, together with the cost properly assessable against those properties, and may appropriate the tax increments from the area to the payment of that cost, in lieu of levying special assessments upon the property. In this event, the amount so appropriated, divided into the same number of installments as the special assessments and with interest at the same rate on the declining balance thereof, is deemed a part of the special assessments appropriated for payment of the cost, within the meaning of section 40-26-08.

When the cost of development or renewal of any development or renewal area has been fully paid and all bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the municipality to pay that cost have been retired, or funds sufficient for the retirement thereof have been received by the municipality, the governing body shall cause this to be reported to the county auditor, who shall thereafter compute the mill rates of all taxes upon the total taxable value of the development or renewal area. Any balance then on hand in the tax increment fund must be distributed by the county treasurer to the state and all political subdivisions having power to tax property in the area, in amounts proportionate to the amounts of the tax losses previously reimbursed to them.

As an alternative to the sale of bonds to be amortized with tax increments as provided in this section, the governing body of a municipality may, in its discretion, grant a total or partial tax exemption for the project in order to provide assistance to a project developer in a development or renewal area, pursuant to agreement with the municipality. However, if a developer of a development or renewal project receives a tax exemption for that project pursuant to this subsection, that project developer may not receive a tax exemption for that project under section 40-57.1-03, 40-57.1-04, 40-57.1-04.1, or 40-57.1-04.3. The amount of annual tax exemption under this subsection is limited to the tax increment as defined in this section as it applies to the development or renewal project and may extend for a period not to exceed fifteen years. In determining the total amount of the tax exemption to be authorized, the municipality shall give due consideration to the same elements as are involved in the sale of bonds to be amortized by tax increments. The amount to be reimbursed, by tax exemption, to the project developer must be all or a portion of eligible public costs which have been paid by the project developer, plus interest on those costs at a rate not to exceed ten percent per annum. The amount of tax exemption must be an amount sufficient to reimburse the project operator for those eligible costs, amortized pursuant to the agreement between the project developer and the municipality.

The governing body of a municipality with an active tax increment financing district may at any time identify funds on hand that are in excess of the costs it determines necessary to complete the activities included in the last approved urban renewal plan for that district. The governing body shall cause the identified surplus to be transferred to the county treasurer to be distributed to the state and all political subdivisions having power to tax property in the area, in amounts proportionate to the most recent five-year average of the property tax levy within the district.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 342, § 1; 1981, ch. 430, § 1; 1983, ch. 589, § 1; 1985, ch. 469, § 1; 1989, ch. 499, § 18; 2011, ch. 300, § 2, 3.

Effective Date.

The 2011 amendment of this section by sections 2 and 3 of chapter 300, S.L. 2011 became effective August 1, 2011.

Note.

Section 40-58-20 was amended 2 times by the 2011 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in sections 2 and 3 of chapter 300, Session Laws 2011, Senate Bill 2050.

Section 2 of S.L. 1981, ch. 430, provided: “The 1981 amendment to subsection 2 of section 40-58-20 is expressly declared to be retroactive to July 1, 1973, and applies to all urban renewal plans for any urban renewal areas established after June 30, 1973”. The 1981 amendment added the last sentence to subsection 2.

40-58-20.1.
Use of tax increment financing for the development of certain industrial or commercial property — Public hearing — Eligible costs of development.

The governing body of a municipality may use the tax increment financing method authorized by section 40-58-20 to assist a project developer in the development of industrial or commercial property, as limited by this section, pursuant to an agreement between the municipality and the project developer.

Prior to entering into an agreement with a project developer under subsection 1, the governing body of the municipality shall consider the agreement at a public hearing, which may be held in conjunction with the public hearing required by subsection 3 of section 40-58-06, after providing written notice of the hearing at least fifteen days prior to the hearing to potential competitors of the prospective industrial or commercial enterprise, and may enter into the agreement only if it determines that the agreement will not result in unfair competition and that the agreement is in the best interests of the municipality as a whole.

For the purpose of determining costs of development of industrial or commercial property to be reimbursed by tax increments under section 40-58-20, only the following public costs necessarily incurred, by either the municipality or the project developer, for the purpose of preparing the property for private development by the project developer may be included in the agreement as reimbursable public costs of development:

The cost of acquiring, or the market value, of all or a part of the industrial or commercial property;

Costs of demolition, removal, or alteration of buildings and improvements on the industrial or commercial property, including the cost of clearing and grading land;

Costs of installation, construction, or reconstruction of streets, utilities, parks, and other public works or improvements necessary for carrying out the development or renewal plan; and

All interest and redemption premiums paid on bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by the municipality to provide funds for the payment of eligible public costs of development.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 499, § 1.

40-58-20.2.
Tax increment financing proposal — Public hearing — Invitation to representatives of affected taxing districts.

Before approval of a development or renewal plan for any development or renewal area under section 40-58-20, the governing body of the municipality shall conduct a public hearing on the proposal. The governing body shall provide invitations to participate in the public hearing to the governing body of each county, school district, and park district within the development or renewal area. At a minimum, the governing body of the municipality shall provide the following information at the public hearing:

The anticipated costs of development of property to be reimbursed by tax incentives.

The anticipated annual revenue from tax increments which will be received to complete the development or renewal plan.

The anticipated date when the plan will be completed, the costs will be fully paid, and the tax increments will be released.

The estimate of the dollars annually attributable to the levies from each taxing entity which will be credited to the tax increment fund.

Before granting a property tax incentive on any parcel of property that is anticipated to receive a property tax incentive for more than five years, the governing body of the municipality must comply with the requirements in section 40-05-24.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 300, § 4; 2017, ch. 277, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

This section became effective August 1, 2011.

Note.

Section 8 of chapter 277, S.L. 2017 provides, “

EFFECTIVE DATE.

Sections 1 through 4 of this Act are effective for property tax incentives approved after July 31, 2017.”